dictionaries/eu_ES/eu_ES.aff
FLAG num
SFX 130 Y 292
SFX 130    0       a      .
SFX 130    0       ak      .
SFX 130    0       arekin      .
SFX 130    0       arekiko/243      .
SFX 130    0       arendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       arentzat      .
SFX 130    0       arentzako/243      .
SFX 130    0       aren/238      .
SFX 130    0       arena      .
SFX 130    0       arenak      .
SFX 130    0       arenarekin      .
SFX 130    0       arenarendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       arenarentzat      .
SFX 130    0       arenari      .
SFX 130    0       arenaz      .
SFX 130    0       arenei      .
SFX 130    0       arenek      .
SFX 130    0       arenekin      .
SFX 130    0       arenendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       arenentzat      .
SFX 130    0       arenetaraino      .
SFX 130    0       arenetarantz      .
SFX 130    0       arenetarat      .
SFX 130    0       arenetara      .
SFX 130    0       arenetatik      .
SFX 130    0       arenetan      .
SFX 130    0       arenetarik      .
SFX 130    0       arenez      .
SFX 130    0       arengan      .
SFX 130    0       arengana      .
SFX 130    0       arenganaino      .
SFX 130    0       arenganantz      .
SFX 130    0       arengandik      .
SFX 130    0       arengatik      .
SFX 130    0       arenoi      .
SFX 130    0       arenok      .
SFX 130    0       arenokin      .
SFX 130    0       arenontzat      .
SFX 130    0       arenotaz      .
SFX 130    0       arenoz      .
SFX 130    0       areni      .
SFX 130    0       arenik      .
SFX 130    0       arenean      .
SFX 130    0       areneraino      .
SFX 130    0       arenerantz      .
SFX 130    0       arenerat      .
SFX 130    0       arenera      .
SFX 130    0       arenetik      .
SFX 130    0       ari      .
SFX 130    0       az      .
SFX 130    0       agan      .
SFX 130    0       agana      .
SFX 130    0       aganaino      .
SFX 130    0       aganantz      .
SFX 130    0       agandik      .
SFX 130    0       agatik      .
SFX 130    0       ei      .
SFX 130    0       ek      .
SFX 130    0       ekin      .
SFX 130    0       ekiko/243      .
SFX 130    0       endako/243      .
SFX 130    0       entzat      .
SFX 130    0       entzako/243      .
SFX 130    0       etako/243      .
SFX 130    0       etakoa      .
SFX 130    0       etakoago/243      .
SFX 130    0       etakoak      .
SFX 130    0       etakoarekin      .
SFX 130    0       etakoarendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       etakoarentzat      .
SFX 130    0       etakoari      .
SFX 130    0       etakoaz      .
SFX 130    0       etakoegi      .
SFX 130    0       etakoei      .
SFX 130    0       etakoek      .
SFX 130    0       etakoekin      .
SFX 130    0       etakoendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       etakoentzat      .
SFX 130    0       etakoetaraino      .
SFX 130    0       etakoetarantz      .
SFX 130    0       etakoetarat      .
SFX 130    0       etakoetara      .
SFX 130    0       etakoetatik      .
SFX 130    0       etakoetan      .
SFX 130    0       etakoetarik      .
SFX 130    0       etakoez      .
SFX 130    0       etakogatik      .
SFX 130    0       etakooi      .
SFX 130    0       etakook      .
SFX 130    0       etakookin      .
SFX 130    0       etakoontzat      .
SFX 130    0       etakootaz      .
SFX 130    0       etakooz      .
SFX 130    0       etakotzat      .
SFX 130    0       etakok      .
SFX 130    0       etakotaraino      .
SFX 130    0       etakotarantz      .
SFX 130    0       etakotarat      .
SFX 130    0       etakotara      .
SFX 130    0       etakotatik      .
SFX 130    0       etakotan      .
SFX 130    0       etakotarik      .
SFX 130    0       etakoz      .
SFX 130    0       etakorekin      .
SFX 130    0       etakorendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       etakorentzat      .
SFX 130    0       etakori      .
SFX 130    0       etakorik      .
SFX 130    0       etakoan      .
SFX 130    0       etakoraino      .
SFX 130    0       etakorantz      .
SFX 130    0       etakorat      .
SFX 130    0       etakora      .
SFX 130    0       etakotik      .
SFX 130    0       etaraino      .
SFX 130    0       etarainoko/243      .
SFX 130    0       etarantz      .
SFX 130    0       etarantzago/243      .
SFX 130    0       etarantzegi      .
SFX 130    0       etaranzko/243      .
SFX 130    0       etarat      .
SFX 130    0       etarako/243      .
SFX 130    0       etara      .
SFX 130    0       etarago/243      .
SFX 130    0       etatik      .
SFX 130    0       etatiko/243      .
SFX 130    0       etan      .
SFX 130    0       etarik      .
SFX 130    0       etariko/243      .
SFX 130    0       ez      .
SFX 130    0       en/238      .
SFX 130    0       ena      .
SFX 130    0       enak      .
SFX 130    0       enarekin      .
SFX 130    0       enarendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       enarentzat      .
SFX 130    0       enari      .
SFX 130    0       enaz      .
SFX 130    0       enei      .
SFX 130    0       enek      .
SFX 130    0       enekin      .
SFX 130    0       enendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       enentzat      .
SFX 130    0       enetaraino      .
SFX 130    0       enetarantz      .
SFX 130    0       enetarat      .
SFX 130    0       enetara      .
SFX 130    0       enetatik      .
SFX 130    0       enetan      .
SFX 130    0       enetarik      .
SFX 130    0       enez      .
SFX 130    0       engan      .
SFX 130    0       engana      .
SFX 130    0       enganaino      .
SFX 130    0       enganantz      .
SFX 130    0       engandik      .
SFX 130    0       engatik      .
SFX 130    0       enoi      .
SFX 130    0       enok      .
SFX 130    0       enokin      .
SFX 130    0       enontzat      .
SFX 130    0       enotaz      .
SFX 130    0       enoz      .
SFX 130    0       eni      .
SFX 130    0       enik      .
SFX 130    0       enean      .
SFX 130    0       eneraino      .
SFX 130    0       enerantz      .
SFX 130    0       enerat      .
SFX 130    0       enera      .
SFX 130    0       enetik      .
SFX 130    0       gatik      .
SFX 130    0       gatiko/243      .
SFX 130    0       oi      .
SFX 130    0       ok      .
SFX 130    0       okin      .
SFX 130    0       okiko/243      .
SFX 130    0       ontzat      .
SFX 130    0       ontzako/243      .
SFX 130    0       otaz      .
SFX 130    0       otako/243      .
SFX 130    0       otaraino      .
SFX 130    0       otarantz      .
SFX 130    0       otarat      .
SFX 130    0       otara      .
SFX 130    0       otatik      .
SFX 130    0       otan      .
SFX 130    0       otarik      .
SFX 130    0       oz      .
SFX 130    0       on      .
SFX 130    0       ona      .
SFX 130    0       onak      .
SFX 130    0       onarekin      .
SFX 130    0       onarendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       onarentzat      .
SFX 130    0       onari      .
SFX 130    0       onaz      .
SFX 130    0       onei      .
SFX 130    0       onek      .
SFX 130    0       onekin      .
SFX 130    0       onendako/243      .
SFX 130    0       onentzat      .
SFX 130    0       onez      .
SFX 130    0       ongan      .
SFX 130    0       ongana      .
SFX 130    0       onganaino      .
SFX 130    0       onganantz      .
SFX 130    0       ongandik      .
SFX 130    0       ongatik      .
SFX 130    0       onoi      .
SFX 130    0       onok      .
SFX 130    0       onokin      .
SFX 130    0       onontzat      .
SFX 130    0       onotaz      .
SFX 130    0       onoz      .
SFX 130    0       oni      .
SFX 130    0       onik      .
SFX 130    0       onean      .
SFX 130    0       oneraino      .
SFX 130    0       onerantz      .
SFX 130    0       onerat      .
SFX 130    0       onera      .
SFX 130    0       onetik      .
SFX 130    0       tzat      .
SFX 130    0       ezko/243      .
SFX 130    0       egatik      .
SFX 130    0       i      .
SFX 130    0       ik      .
SFX 130    0       ean      .
SFX 130    0       eko/243      .
SFX 130    0       ekoa      .
